Massachusetts, session 194th, H4949.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Section 16D of chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 4 and 5, the words “commissioner of
3 insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health
4 insurance.
5 SECTION 2. Section 16D of said chapter 6A, most recently amended by section 2 of
6 chapter 343 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by inserting after the words “health
7 policy commission established by section 16 of chapter 6D” the following words:- , and the
8 managed care bureau in the division of health insurance”
9 SECTION 3. Section 16G of said chapter 6A, most recently amended by section 16 of
10 chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby further amended by striking out subsection (b) and
11 inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
1 of 38

12 (b) The following divisions and agencies shall be within the department of consumer
13 affairs and business regulation: the division of banks, the division of insurance, the division of
14 health insurance, the division of standards, the division of occupational licensure and the
15 SECTION 4. Section 16Q of said chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the
16 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 13, the word “insurance” and
17 inserting in place thereof the following words:- health insurance.
18 SECTION 5. Section 16Z of said chapter 6A, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
19 hereby amended by striking out, in line 7, the word “insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
20 following words:- health insurance.
21 SECTION 6. Section 1 of said chapter 6D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
22 striking out, in lines 168 and 169, the word “insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
23 following words:- health insurance.
24 SECTION 7. Subsection (b) and (c) of section 2 of said chapter 6D, most recently
25 amended by section 12 of chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking
26 out each time they appear, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof,
27 in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
28 SECTION 8. Subsection (d) of section 8 of said chapter 6D, most recently amended by
29 section 18 of chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the
30 words “(xii) a representative from the division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
31 following words:- (xii) a representative from the division of health insurance.
2 of 38

32 SECTION 9. Section 11 of said chapter 6D of the General Laws, most recently amended
33 by section 18 of chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out striking each
34 time they appear, words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance,
35 the following words:- division of health insurance.
36 SECTION 10. Section 15 of said chapter 6D, as appearing the 2022 Official Edition, is
37 hereby amended by striking out, in line 38, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in
38 place thereof the following words:- division of health insurance.
39 SECTION 11. Section 16 of said chapter 6D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
40 striking out, in lines 9, 12 and 67, each time they appear, the words “division of insurance” and
41 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- division of health insurance.
42 SECTION 12. Said section 16 of said chapter 6D, as so appearing, is hereby further
43 amended by striking out, in lines 43 and 44, the words “commissioner of insurance” and
44 inserting in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
45 SECTION 13. Paragraph (b) of subsection (b) of section 22 of said chapter 6D, inserted
46 by section 25 of chapter 342 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by the striking out the
47 words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- division of
48 health insurance.
49 SECTION 14. Section 23 of said chapter 6D, inserted by section 14 of chapter 342 of the
50 Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by the striking out the words “division of insurance” and
51 inserting in place thereof the following words:- division of health insurance.
3 of 38

52 SECTION 15. Section 11F of chapter 12, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
53 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “division of insurance within the
54 department of banking and insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
55 division of insurance or the division of health insurance within the department of banking,
56 insurance and health insurance.
57 SECTION 16. Said section 1 of chapter 12C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
58 striking out, in lines 189 and 190, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place
59 thereof the following words:- division of health insurance.
60 SECTION 17. Subsection (a) of section 2A of said chapter 12C, most recently amended
61 by section 37 of chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the
62 words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the
63 following words:- commissioner of health insurance..
64 SECTION 18. Section 3 of said chapter 12C, most recently amended by section 37 of
65 chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the words “division of
66 insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- division of health insurance.
67 SECTION 19. Section 9 of said chapter 12C, most recently amended by section 37 of
68 chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out, each time they
69 appear, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the
70 following words:- division of health insurance.
71 SECTION 20. Section 10 of said chapter 12C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
72 striking out, in lines 24 and 25, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof
73 the following words:- division of health insurance.
4 of 38

74 SECTION 21. Said section 10 of said chapter 12C, as so appearing, is hereby further
75 amended by striking out, in lines 96 and 97, the words “commissioner of insurance” and
76 inserting in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
77 SECTION 22. Paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of said chapter 12C, most recently
78 amended by section 44 of chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking
79 out the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
80 commissioner of health insurance.
81 SECTION 23. Clause (ii) of the third sentence of section 17 of said chapter 12C, most
82 recently amended by section 49 of chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended further by
83 striking out the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following
84 words:- division of health insurance.
85 SECTION 24. Section 1 of chapter 24A of the General Laws is hereby further amended
86 by striking out, in lines 18 and 19, as so appearing, the words “department of banking and
87 insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- department of banking, insurance
88 and health insurance.
89 SECTION 25. Chapter 26 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out the title
90 and inserting in place thereof the following title:- DEPARTMENT OF BANKING,
91 INSURANCE AND HEALTH INSURANCE
92 SECTION 26. Chapter 26 of the General Laws is hereby further amended by striking out
93 section 1, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following
94 section:-
5 of 38

95 Section 1. (a) There shall be a department of banking, insurance and health insurance
96 consisting of a division of banks and loan agencies, a division of insurance and a division of
97 health insurance.
98 (b)(1) The division of health insurance shall have authority to oversee the health
99 insurance market in the commonwealth and regulate companies organized to transact business
100 and offering policies of accident and sickness insurance under chapter 175; nonprofit hospital
101 service corporations under chapter 176A; nonprofit medical service corporations under chapter
102 176B; nonprofit medical service plans under chapter 176C; dental service corporations under
103 chapter 176E; optometric service corporations under chapter 176F; health maintenance
104 organizations under chapter 176G; preferred provider arrangements under chapter 176I; health
105 benefit plans under chapter 176J; Medicare supplemental insurance or Medicare select insurance
106 contracts authorized under chapter 176K; nongroup health plans under chapter 176M; risk-
107 bearing provider organizations under chapter 176T; long-term care insurance policies under
108 chapter 176U; and dental benefit insurance plans under chapter 176X.
109 (2) The division of insurance shall have authority for oversight over all other insurance
110 markets not included in paragraph 1.
111 (c) Each division shall have a commissioner who shall be known, respectively, as the
112 commissioner of banks, the commissioner of insurance and the commissioner of health
113 insurance. The commissioners shall act as a board in all matters concerning the department as a
114 whole.
6 of 38

115 SECTION 27. Said chapter 26 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
116 section 7A, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following
117 section:-
118 Section 7A. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
119 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
120 “Rate review”, any examination performed by the commissioner of the aggregate rates of
121 payment pursuant to sections 5, 6 and 10 of chapter 176A; section 4 of chapter 176B; section 16
122 of chapter 176G; section 6 of chapter 176J; and section 7 of chapter 176K.
123 (b) There shall be within the division of health insurance a health insurance access bureau
124 overseen by a deputy commissioner, whose duties shall include, but not be limited to, subject to
125 the direction of the commissioner of insurance, rate review of premium rates for health benefit
126 plans offered, issued or renewed in the commonwealth, administration of the division's statutory
127 and regulatory authority for oversight of the small group and individual health insurance market,
128 oversight of affordable health plans, including coverage for young adults, as well as the
129 dissemination of appropriate information to consumers about health insurance coverage and
130 access to affordable products. The deputy commissioner shall: (i) protect the interests of
131 consumers of health insurance; (ii) encourage fair treatment of health care providers by health
132 insurers; (iii) enhance equity, access, quality and affordability in the health care system; (iv)
133 guard the solvency of health insurers; (v) work cooperatively with the health policy commission
134 and the center for health information and analysis to monitor health care spending; and (vi)
135 prioritize affordability of health insurance products during rate review.
7 of 38

136 (c) The deputy commissioner shall develop affordability standards to consider during rate
137 review; provided, however, that the commissioner’s review of a carrier’s rates shall adhere to
138 principles of solvency and actuarial soundness. Such standards shall consider the following:
139 (i) affordability for consumers, including the totality of costs paid by consumers of health
140 insurance for covered benefits including, but not limited to, the enrollee’s share of premium, out-
141 of-pocket maximum amounts, deductibles, copays, coinsurance and other forms of cost sharing
142 for health insurance coverage;
143 (ii) affordability for purchasers, including the totality of costs paid by purchasers of
144 health insurance including, but not limited to, premium costs, actuarial value of coverage for
145 covered benefits and the value delivered on health care spending in terms of improved quality
146 and cost efficiency; and
147 (iii) the impact of proposed rates on the commonwealth’s performance against the health
148 care cost growth benchmark established in section 9 of chapter 6D.
149 (d) The deputy commissioner shall review data and documents submitted to the division
150 including, but not limited to, any materials submitted as part of rate reviews, to examine the
151 causes of premium rate increases and excessive provider price variation.
152 (e)The commissioner shall appoint, at a minimum, the following employees: a first
153 deputy, a general counsel, a chief health economist, a chief actuary, a chief research analyst, and
154 a chief examiner. The appointed employees shall devote their full time to the duties of their
155 offices, shall be exempt from chapters 30 and 31 and shall serve at the pleasure of the
156 commissioner. The commissioner may appoint and remove additional employees, including
157 deputies, economists, analysts, examiners, assistant actuaries, inspectors, clerks and other
8 of 38

158 assistants as the work of the bureau may require. Such additional employees shall perform such
159 duties as the commissioner may prescribe.
160 (f) The commissioner shall make and collect an assessment against the carriers licensed
161 under chapters 175, 176A, 176B, 176E, 176F and 176G to pay for the expenses of the bureau.
162 The assessment shall be at a rate sufficient to produce $2,000,000 annually. In addition to that
163 amount, the assessment shall include an amount to be credited to the General Fund which shall
164 be equal to the total amount of funds estimated by the secretary of administration and finance to
165 be expended from the General Fund for indirect and fringe benefit costs attributable to the
166 personnel costs of the bureau. The assessment shall be allocated on a fair and reasonable basis
167 among all carriers licensed under said chapters. The funds produced by the assessments shall be
168 expended by the bureau, in addition to any other funds which may be appropriated, to assist in
169 defraying the general operating expenses of the bureau, and may be used to compensate
170 consultants retained by the division. A carrier licensed under said chapters shall pay the amount
171 assessed against it within 30 days after the date of the notice of assessment from the
172 commissioner.
173 SECTION 28. Section 7B of said chapter 26, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
174 inserting after the word “commissioner”, in line 2, the following words:- of health insurance.
175 SECTION 29. Said section 7B of said chapter 26, as so appearing, is hereby further
176 amended by striking out, in line 9, the word “bureau” and inserting in place thereof the following
177 words:- division of health insurance.
178 SECTION 30. Section 8H of said chapter 26, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
179 striking out the first and second paragraphs.
9 of 38

180 SECTION 31. Said section 8H of said chapter 26, as so appearing, is hereby further
181 amended by striking out, in lines 48, 55 and 73 and 74, the words “division of insurance” and
182 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- division of health insurance.
183 SECTION 32. Said section 8H of said chapter 26, as so appearing, is hereby further
184 amended by striking out, in line 90, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in
185 place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
186 SECTION 33. Section 8K of said chapter 26, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
187 striking out, in line 1, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
188 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
189 SECTION 34. Said section 8K of said chapter 26, as so appearing, is hereby further
190 amended by striking out, in line 28, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place
191 thereof the following words:- division of health insurance.
192 SECTION 35. Section 8M of said chapter 26, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
193 striking out, in lines 6 and 74 and 75, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in
194 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
195 SECTION 36. Said section 8M of said chapter 26, as so appearing, is hereby further
196 amended by striking out, in lines 128 and 129, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in
197 place thereof the following words:- division of health insurance.
198 SECTION 37. Section 3 of chapter 32A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
199 amended by striking out, in line 5, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
200 thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
10 of 38

201 SECTION 38. Section 17Q of said chapter 32A, most recently amended by section 1 of
202 chapter 285 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, each time they appear, the
203 words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
204 words:- division of health insurance.
205 SECTION 39. Section 22B of said chapter 32A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
206 striking out, in lines 7 and 101 and 102, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in
207 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
208 SECTION 40. Section 25 of said chapter 32A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
209 striking out, in lines 78 and 79 and 94, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in
210 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
211 SECTION 41. Subsection (c) of section 8B of chapter 62C of the General Laws, as so
212 appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the third and fourth sentences and inserting in place
213 thereof the following 2 sentences:- The commissioner of revenue, in consultation with the
214 commissioner of health insurance, may specify the content and format of the statements and
215 reports. The commissioner of revenue may disclose the information in the statements and reports
216 to the division of health insurance, the center for health information and analysis and the
217 commonwealth health insurance connector.
218 SECTION 42. Said section 8B of said chapter 62C, as so appearing, is hereby further
219 amended by striking out, in lines 35 and 36, the words “commissioner of insurance” and
220 inserting in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
11 of 38

221 SECTION 43. Section 21 of said chapter 62C is hereby amended by inserting after the
222 word “insurance”, in line 146, as so appearing, the following words:- , the division of health
223 insurance.
224 SECTION 44. Section 12 of chapter 62E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
225 amended by inserting after the word “insurance”, in lines 19 and 20, the following words:- , the
226 division of health insurance.
227 SECTION 45. Section 26 of chapter 63 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
228 amended by striking out, in lines 3 and 4, the words “and the commissioner of insurance” and
229 inserting in place thereof the following words:- , the commissioner of insurance and the
230 commissioner of health insurance.
231 SECTION 46. Chapter 110C of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
232 section 11, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
233 Section 11. If the offeror or a target company is an insurance company subject to
234 regulation under chapter 175 to chapter 175C, inclusive, the commissioner of insurance
235 appointed pursuant to section 6 of chapter 26 or their designee, or the commissioner of health
236 insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A of chapter 26, or their designee, as appropriate, shall
237 for all purposes of this section be substituted for the secretary. This section shall not be construed
238 to limit or modify in any way any responsibility, authority, power or jurisdiction of the secretary,
239 the commissioner of insurance or the commissioner of health insurance pursuant to any other
240 provisions of law.
12 of 38

241 SECTION 47. Section 24N of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
242 hereby amended by striking out, in line 71, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting
243 in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
244 SECTION 48. Section 206A of said chapter 111, as appearing in the 2022 Official
245 Editions, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 1 and 2, the words “division of insurance”
246 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- division of health insurance.
247 SECTION 49. Section 218 of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
248 striking out, in line 2, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
249 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
250 SECTION 50. Section 2 of chapter 111K of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
251 amended by striking out, in lines 4 and 5, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting
252 in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
253 SECTION 51. Section 1 of chapter 111M of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
254 amended by striking out, in lines 34 and 35, the words “commissioner of insurance” and
255 inserting in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
256 SECTION 52. Section 9C of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
257 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 43 and 44 and lines 147 and 148, the
258 words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the
259 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
13 of 38

260 SECTION 53. Section 9D of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
261 striking out, in line 183, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
262 following words:- division of health insurance.
263 SECTION 54. Section 13D of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
264 striking out, in line 17, each time they appear, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in
265 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- division of health insurance.
266 SECTION 55. Section 69 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
267 striking out, in line 58, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
268 following words:- division of health insurance.
269 SECTION 56. Section 189 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
270 amended by striking out, in lines 68 and 69, the words “and (iv) the commissioner of insurance
271 or a designee” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- (iv) the commissioner of
272 insurance or a designee; and (v) the commissioner of health insurance or a designee.
273 SECTION 57. Section 1 of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
274 amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the
275 following definition:-
276 “Commissioner”, (i) the commissioner of insurance appointed pursuant to section 6 of
277 chapter 26, or their designee, or, as appropriate, (ii) the commissioner of health insurance
278 appointed pursuant to section 7A of said chapter 26, or their designee, to the extent that this
279 chapter applies to companies that are regulated by the division of health insurance pursuant to
280 section 1 of said chapter 26.
14 of 38

281 SECTION 58. Said section 1 of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further
282 amended by inserting after the definition of “Contract on a Variable Basis” the following
283 definition:-
284 “Division”, the division of insurance or the division of health insurance, as appropriate.
285 SECTION 59. Section 4 of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
286 striking out, in line 9, the words “of insurance”.
287 SECTION 60. Section 24D of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in
288 lines 19, 32 and 33, 59 and 99, by inserting after the words “commissioner of insurance”, the
289 following words, in each instance:- and the commissioner of health insurance.
290 SECTION 61. Section 24E of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
291 inserting after the word “insurance”, in line 70, the following words:- and the commissioner of
292 health insurance.
293 SECTION 62. Said section 24E of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further
294 amended by inserting after the word “insurance”, in line 102, the following words:- or the
295 commissioner of health insurance.
296 SECTION 63. Section 24F of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in
297 lines 17, 29 and 30, 65 and 83, by inserting after the words “commissioner of insurance”, the
298 following words, in each instance:- and the commissioner of health insurance.
299 SECTION 64. Said section 24F of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further
300 amended by inserting after the word “insurance”, in line 100, the following words:- or the
301 commissioner of health insurance.
15 of 38

302 SECTION 65. Section 47B of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
303 striking out, in line 142, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
304 following words:- division of health insurance.
305 SECTION 66. Section 47J of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
306 striking out, in line 1, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
307 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
308 SECTION 67. Section 47W of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
309 striking out, in line 117, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof
310 the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
311 SECTION 68. Section 47AA of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
312 striking out, in lines 83 and 84 and line 99, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting
313 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
314 SECTION 69. Section 47KK of said chapter 175, most recently amended by section 20 of
315 chapter 285 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, each time they appear, the
316 words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
317 words:- division of health insurance.
318 SECTION 70. Section 47TT of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
319 striking out, in line 51, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
320 following words:- division of health insurance.
16 of 38

321 SECTION 71. Section 108 of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
322 striking out, in lines 681 and 682, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
323 thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
324 SECTION 72. Section 108I of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
325 striking out, in line 58, the words “of insurance”.
326 SECTION 73. Section 108M of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
327 striking out, in line 10, the words “of insurance”.
328 SECTION 74. Section 110I of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
329 striking out, in line 23, the words “of insurance”.
330 SECTION 75. Section 110J of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
331 striking out, in line 22, the words “of insurance”.
332 SECTION 76. Section 206 of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
333 striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the following
334 definition:-
335 “Commissioner”, (i) the commissioner of insurance appointed pursuant to section 6 of
336 chapter 26, or their designee, or, as appropriate, (ii) the commissioner of health insurance
337 appointed pursuant to section 7A of said chapter 26, or their designee, to the extent that this
338 chapter applies to companies that are regulated by the division of health insurance pursuant to
339 section 1 of said chapter 26.
17 of 38

340 SECTION 77. Said section 206 of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further
341 amended by striking out the definition of “Division” and inserting in place thereof the following
342 definition:-
343 “Division”, the division of insurance or the division of health insurance, as appropriate.
344 SECTION 78. Section 206C of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
345 striking out, in lines 647 and 648, the words “division of insurance’s” and inserting in place
346 thereof the following words:- division’s.
347 SECTION 79. Chapter 175B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
348 section 1 the following section:-
349 Section 1A. For the purposes of this chapter, the term “commissioner” shall mean: (i) the
350 commissioner of insurance appointed pursuant to section 6 of chapter 26, or their designee, or, as
351 appropriate, (ii) the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A of said
352 chapter 26, or their designee, to the extent that this chapter applies to companies that are
353 regulated by the division of health insurance pursuant to section 1 of said chapter 26.
354 SECTION 80. Section 2 of said chapter 175B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
355 is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 9, 18, and 20 and 21, each time they appear, the
356 words “of insurance”.
357 SECTION 81. Section 3A of said chapter 175B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
358 striking out, in line 7, the words “of insurance”.
359 SECTION 82. Section 1 of chapter 175D of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
360 amended by striking out paragraph (1) and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
18 of 38

361 (1) “Commissioner”, (i) the commissioner of insurance appointed pursuant to section 6 of
362 chapter 26, or their designee, or, as appropriate, (ii) the commissioner of health insurance
363 appointed pursuant to section 7A of said chapter 26, or their designee, to the extent that this
364 chapter applies to companies that are regulated by the division of health insurance pursuant to
365 section 1 of said chapter 26.
366 SECTION 83. Section 2 of chapter 175I of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
367 amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the
368 following definition:-
369 “Commissioner”, (i) the commissioner of insurance appointed pursuant to section 6 of
370 chapter 26, or their designee, or, as appropriate, (ii) the commissioner of health insurance
371 appointed pursuant to section 7A of said chapter 26, or their designee, to the extent that this
372 chapter applies to companies that are regulated by the division of health insurance pursuant to
373 section 1 of said chapter 26.
374 SECTION 84. Section 9 of said chapter 175I, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
375 striking out, in lines 21 and 22, the words “of insurance”.
376 SECTION 85. Section 2 of chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
377 amended by striking out, in lines 11 and 12, and lines 13 and 14, the words “commissioner of
378 insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner
379 of health insurance.
380 SECTION 86. Section 3 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
381 striking out, in lines 3 and 4, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
382 thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
19 of 38

383 SECTION 87. Section 5 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
384 inserting after the word “corporation.”, in line 44, the following sentence:- For the purposes of
385 the review of rates of payment under this section, “not excessive” shall include considerations of
386 affordability for consumers and purchasers of health insurance products.
387 SECTION 88. Said section 5 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby further
388 amended by striking out, in lines 205 and 206, the words “commissioner of insurance shall on
389 December thirty-first, nineteen hundred and seventy and annually thereafter require” and
390 inserting in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance shall require
391 annually, on December 31,.
392 SECTION 89. The second paragraph of section 6 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing,
393 is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- For the purposes of the review of rates of
394 payment under this section, whether a contract is not excessive shall include considerations of
395 affordability for consumers and purchasers of health insurance products.
396 SECTION 90. Section 7 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
397 striking out, in lines 1 and 11, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
398 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
399 SECTION 91. Section 8 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
400 striking out, in line 27, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
401 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
402 SECTION 92. Section 8A of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
403 striking out, in line 142, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
404 following words:- division of health insurance.
20 of 38

405 SECTION 93. Section 8F of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
406 striking out, in line 19, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
407 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
408 SECTION 94. Section 8M of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
409 striking out, in line 1, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
410 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
411 SECTION 95. Section 8W of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
412 striking out, in line 114, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof
413 the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
414 SECTION 96. Section 8DD of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
415 striking out, in lines 81 and 82 and line 97, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting
416 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
417 SECTION 97. Section 8MM of said chapter 176A, most recently amended by section 24
418 of chapter 285 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, each time they appear, the
419 words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
420 words:- division of health insurance.
421 SECTION 98. Section 8UU of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
422 striking out, in line 41, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
423 following words:- division of health insurance.
424 SECTION 99. Section 10 of said chapter 176A, most recently amended by section 75 of
425 chapter 343 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the words “commissioner of
21 of 38

426 insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health
427 insurance.
428 SECTION 100. Section 11 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
429 striking out, in line 13, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
430 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
431 SECTION 101. Section 15 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
432 striking out, in line 3, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
433 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
434 SECTION 102. Section 16 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
435 striking out, in line 1, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
436 words:- commissioner of health insurance.
437 SECTION 103. Section 17 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in
438 lines 9 and 11, by inserting after the words “commissioner of insurance”, each time they appear,
439 the following words, in each instance:- and the commissioner of health insurance.
440 SECTION 104. Section 18 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
441 striking out, in line 3, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
442 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
443 SECTION 105. Section 20 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
444 striking out, in line 3, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
445 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
22 of 38

446 SECTION 106. Section 21 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
447 striking out, in line 1, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
448 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
449 SECTION 107. Section 22 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
450 striking out, in line 3, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
451 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
452 SECTION 108. Section 23 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
453 striking out, in line 1, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
454 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
455 SECTION 109. Section 24 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
456 striking out, in line 19, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
457 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
458 SECTION 110. Section 25 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
459 striking out, in line 4, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
460 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
461 SECTION 111. Section 31 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
462 striking out, in line 5, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
463 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
464 SECTION 112. Section 37 of said chapter 176A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
465 striking out, in line 10, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
466 following words:- division of health insurance.
23 of 38

467 SECTION 113. Section 1 of chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
468 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
469 the following definition:-
470 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
471 of chapter 26, or their designee.
472 SECTION 114. Said section 1 of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby further
473 amended by inserting after the definition of “Dependent” the following definition:-
474 “Division”, the division of health insurance.
475 SECTION 115. Section 4 of said chapter 176B, most recently amended by section 76 of
476 chapter 343 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the words “commissioner of
477 insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health
478 insurance.
479 SECTION 116. Section 4A of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
480 striking out, in line 137, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
481 following words:- division of health insurance.
482 SECTION 117. Section 4M of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
483 striking out, in line 1, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
484 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
485 SECTION 118. Section 4DD of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended
486 by striking out, in lines 80 and 81 and line 96, the words “commissioner of insurance” and
24 of 38

487 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health
488 insurance.
489 SECTION 119. Section 4MM of said chapter 176B, most recently amended by section 26
490 of chapter 285 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, each time they appear, the
491 words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
492 words:- division of health insurance.
493 SECTION 120. Section 4UU of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended
494 by striking out, in line 40, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
495 following words:- division of health insurance.
496 SECTION 121. Section 6 of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
497 striking out, in line 16, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
498 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
499 SECTION 122. Section 6B of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
500 striking out, in lines 18 and 19, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
501 thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
502 SECTION 123. Section 10 of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
503 striking out, in line 34, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
504 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
505 SECTION 124. Section 12 of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
506 striking out, in lines 8 and 9, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
507 following words:- division of health insurance.
25 of 38

508 SECTION 125. Section 24 of said chapter 176B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
509 striking out, in line 10, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
510 following words:- division of health insurance.
511 SECTION 126. Section 9 of chapter 176C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
512 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 2 and 3 and lines 6 and 7, the words “commissioner of
513 insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner
514 of health insurance.
515 SECTION 127. Section 10 of said chapter 176C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
516 striking out, in lines 1, 9 and 13, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
517 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
518 SECTION 128. Section 17 of said chapter 176C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
519 striking out, in line 6, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
520 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
521 SECTION 129. Section 1 of chapter 176D of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
522 hereby amended by striking out paragraph (b) and inserting in place thereof the following
523 paragraph:-
524 (b) “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section
525 7A of chapter 26, or their designee.
526 SECTION 130. Section 3B of said chapter 176D, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
527 striking out, in line 120, the words “commissioner of the division of insurance” and inserting in
528 place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
26 of 38

529 SECTION 131. Section 1 of chapter 176E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
530 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
531 the following definition:-
532 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
533 of chapter 26, or their designee.
534 SECTION 132. Section 6 of said chapter 176E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
535 striking out, in line 22, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
536 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
537 SECTION 133. Section 12 of said chapter 176E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
538 striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
539 following words:- division of health insurance.
540 SECTION 134. Section 1 of chapter 176F of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
541 amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the
542 following definition:-
543 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
544 of chapter 26, or their designee.
545 SECTION 135. Section 12 of said chapter 176F, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
546 striking out, in line 7, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
547 following words:- division of health insurance.
27 of 38

548 SECTION 136. Section 1 of chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
549 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
550 the following definition:-
551 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
552 of chapter 26, or their designee.
553 SECTION 137. Section 4M of said chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
554 striking out, in line 134, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
555 following words:- division of health insurance.
556 SECTION 138. Section 4V of said chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
557 striking out, in lines 80 and 81 and line 96, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting
558 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
559 SECTION 139. Section 4EE of said chapter 176G, most recently amended by section 28
560 of chapter 285 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, each time they appear, the
561 words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following
562 words:- division of health insurance.
563 SECTION 140. Section 4MM of said chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby amended
564 by striking out, in line 40, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
565 following words:- division of health insurance.
566 SECTION 141. Section 5A of said chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
567 striking out, in lines 18 and 19, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
568 thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
28 of 38

569 SECTION 142. Section 8 of said chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
570 striking out, in line 7, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
571 following words:- division of health insurance.
572 SECTION 143. Section 17 of said chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
573 striking out, in line 8, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
574 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
575 SECTION 144. Section 32 of said chapter 176G, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
576 striking out, in line 10, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
577 following words:- division of health insurance.
578 SECTION 145. Section 1 of chapter 176I of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
579 amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the
580 following definition:-
581 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
582 of chapter 26, or their designee.
583 SECTION 146. Section 8 of said chapter 176I, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
584 striking out, in line 16, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
585 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
586 SECTION 147. Section 1 of chapter 176J of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
587 amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the
588 following definition:-
29 of 38

589 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
590 of chapter 26, or their designee.
591 SECTION 148. Section 4 of said section 176J, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
592 striking out, in lines 75 and 80, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
593 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
594 SECTION 149. Section 6 of said section 176J, most recently amended by section 75 of
595 chapter 343 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out, each time they appear, the
596 words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof ,in each instance, the following
597 words:- division of health insurance.
598 SECTION 150. Section 10 of said section 176J, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
599 striking out, in lines 1 and 11, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof, in
600 each instance, the following words:- division of health insurance.
601 SECTION 151. Section 11 of said section 176J, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
602 striking out, in lines 16 and 69 and 70, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in
603 place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
604 SECTION 152. Said section 11 of said section 176J, as so appearing, is hereby further
605 amended by striking out, in lines 35, 93, 95 and 107, the words “division of insurance” and
606 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- division of health insurance.
607 SECTION 153. Said section 11A of said chapter 176J, as so appearing, is hereby further
608 amended by striking out, in lines 31 and 32, the words “division of health care finance and
30 of 38

609 policy” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- center for health information and
610 analysis.
611 SECTION 154. Section 17 of said chapter 176J, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
612 striking out, in line 10, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
613 following words:- division of health insurance.
614 SECTION 155. Section 1 of chapter 176K of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
615 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
616 the following definition:-
617 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
618 of chapter 26, or their designee.
619 SECTION 156. Section 1 of chapter 176M of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
620 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 21 and 22, the words “commissioner of insurance” and
621 inserting in place thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
622 SECTION 157. Said section 1 of said chapter 176M, as so appearing, is hereby further
623 amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the
624 following definition:-
625 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
626 of chapter 26, or their designee.
627 SECTION 158. Section 2 of said chapter 176M, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
628 striking out, in line 156, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof
629 the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
31 of 38

630 SECTION 159. Section 3 said chapter 176M, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
631 striking out, in line 107, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof
632 the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
633 SECTION 160. Section 1 of chapter 176N of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
634 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
635 the following definition:-
636 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
637 of chapter 26, or their designee.
638 SECTION 161. Section 1 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
639 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
640 the following definition:-
641 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
642 of chapter 26, or their designee.
643 SECTION 162. Said section 1 of said chapter 176O, as so appearing, is hereby further
644 amended by striking out the definition of “Division” and inserting in place thereof the following
645 definition:-
646 “Division”, the division of health insurance.
647 SECTION 163. Section 2 of said chapter 176O, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
648 striking out, in lines 79, 83 and 90, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
649 thereof, in each instance, the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
32 of 38

650 SECTION 164. Section 5B of said chapter 176O, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
651 striking out, in lines 3 and 4, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
652 following words:- division of health insurance.
653 SECTION 165. Section 12B said chapter 176O, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
654 striking out, in line 3, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
655 following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
656 SECTION 166. Section 14 said chapter 176O is hereby amended by striking out, in lines
657 14 and 15, as so appearing, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof
658 the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
659 SECTION 167. Said section 14 said chapter 176O is hereby further amended by striking
660 out, in lines 93 and 94 and 108 and 109, as so appearing, the words “division of insurance”, each
661 time they appear, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- division
662 of health insurance.
663 SECTION 168. Section 1 of chapter 176Q of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
664 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
665 the following definition:-
666 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
667 of chapter 26, or their designee.
668 SECTION 169. Section 2 of said chapter 176Q, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
669 striking out, in lines 18 and 19, the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place
670 thereof the following words:- commissioner of health insurance.
33 of 38

671 SECTION 170. Section 3 of said chapter 176Q, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
672 striking out, in line 86, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
673 following words:- division of health insurance.
674 SECTION 171. Section 1 of chapter 176R of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
675 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
676 the following definition:-
677 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
678 of chapter 26, or their designee.
679 SECTION 172. Section 1 of chapter 176S of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
680 amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof the
681 following definition:-
682 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
683 of chapter 26, or their designee.
684 SECTION 173. Section 1 of chapter 176T of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
685 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
686 the following definition:-
687 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
688 of chapter 26, or their designee.
689 SECTION 174. Section 1 of chapter 176U of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
690 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
691 the following definition:-
34 of 38

692 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
693 of chapter 26, or their designee.
694 SECTION 175. Section 6 of said chapter 176U, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
695 striking out, in lines 42 and 43, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof
696 the following words:- division of health insurance.
697 SECTION 176. Section 7 of said chapter 176U, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
698 striking out, in line 26, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the
699 following words:- division of health insurance.
700 SECTION 177. Section 1 of chapter 176V of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
701 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
702 the following definition:-
703 “Commissioner”, (i) the commissioner of insurance appointed pursuant to section 6 of
704 chapter 26, or their designee, or, as appropriate, (ii) the commissioner of health insurance
705 appointed pursuant to section 7A of said chapter 26, or their designee, to the extent that this
706 chapter applies to companies that are regulated by the division of health insurance pursuant to
707 section 1 of said chapter 26.
708 SECTION 178. Section 1 of chapter 176W of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
709 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
710 the following definition:-
711 “Commissioner”, (i) the commissioner of insurance appointed pursuant to section 6 of
712 chapter 26, or their designee, or, as appropriate, (ii) the commissioner of health insurance
35 of 38

713 appointed pursuant to section 7A of said chapter 26, or their designee, to the extent that this
714 chapter applies to companies that are regulated by the division of health insurance pursuant to
715 section 1 of said chapter 26.
716 SECTION 179. Said section 1 of said chapter 176W, as so appearing, is hereby further
717 amended by striking out the definition of “Division” and inserting in place thereof the following
718 definition:-
719 “Division”, the division of insurance or the division of health insurance, as appropriate.
720 SECTION 180. Section 1 of chapter 176X of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
721 hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting in place thereof
722 the following definition:-
723 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
724 of chapter 26, or their designee.
725 SECTION 181. Section 2 of said chapter 176X, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
726 striking out, in lines 3, 75 and 76, and 90, the words “division of insurance” and inserting in
727 place thereof the following words:- division of health insurance.
728 SECTION 182. Section 1 of chapter 176Y, inserted by section 37 of chapter 342 of the
729 acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Commissioner” and inserting
730 in place thereof the following definition:-
731 “Commissioner”, the commissioner of health insurance appointed pursuant to section 7A
732 of chapter 26, or their designee.
36 of 38

733 SECTION 183. Said section 1 of said chapter 176Y, inserted by section 37 of chapter 342
734 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out the definition of “Division” and
735 inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
736 “Division”, the division of health insurance.
737 SECTION 184. Subsection (e) of section 3 of chapter 176Y, inserted by section 37 of
738 chapter 342 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out the words” division of
739 insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- division of health insurance.
740 SECTION 185. Section 24 of chapter 197 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
741 striking out subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
742 (d) The division of health insurance and the division of medical assistance shall issue
743 sub-regulatory guidance to effectuate the purposes of this section.
744 SECTION 186. Subsection (b) of section 34 of said chapter 197 of the acts of 2024 is
745 hereby amended by striking out, each time they appear, the words “division of insurance” and
746 inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- division of health insurance.
747 SECTION 187. Section 39 of chapter 285 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
748 striking out the words “division of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following
749 words:- division of health insurance.
750 SECTION 188. Section 40 of chapter 342 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
751 striking out the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following
752 words:- commissioner of health insurance.
37 of 38

753 SECTION 189. Section 80 of chapter 343 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
754 striking out the words “commissioner of insurance” and inserting in place thereof the following
755 words:- commissioner of health insurance.
756 SECTION 190. Said section 80 of said chapter 343 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further
757 amended by striking out, each time they appear, the words “division of insurance” and inserting
758 in place thereof, in each instance, the following words:- division of health insurance.
38 of 38